Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2711
Homeowner, defined.

Homeowner means the owner of a residence in foreclosure, including a vendee under a contract for deed to real property as defined in section 45-335.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 52;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 109.